Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-161
Joint city and school district facility; annual budget of city and school district.

The school district and the city of the second class shall each provide in their annual budgets an item for their proportion of the expense of maintaining any joint municipal and recreation building or joint recreational and athletic field built pursuant to section 17-156.

Laws 1953, c. 37, § 6, p. 129;

Laws 1955, c. 39, § 5, p. 154;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 49.